Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-1549
Disclosure of information; immunity.

An insurer or trained individual who, acting reasonably and in good faith, makes a disclosure of information to the director pursuant to the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from Insurance Exploitation Act or the Insurance Fraud Act shall be immune from administrative or civil liability that might otherwise arise from such disclosure or for any failure to notify the eligible adult of the disclosure. This section shall not abrogate or modify any existing statutory or common law privileges or immunities.

Laws 2026, LB967, § 19.
July 18, 2026
Insurance Fraud Act, see section 44-6601.